California, session 20252026, SB1337.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. (a)The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(1)(a) California’s pioneering climate and air quality policies are critical to protecting our communities’ health, which has led to a rapid evolution of California’s petroleum market.(2)(b) Decreasing demand, economic factors, and volatility of the international petroleum market introduces uncertainty to the petroleum industry that impacts consumers, the workforce, and fence-line communities.(3)(c) Successfully managing the state’s longstanding leadership in addressing climate, air quality, health, and environmental issues will require coordinated actions by, and strategic alignment of, state, regional, and local jurisdictions.(4)(d) An abrupt loss of refinery capacity and the resulting increased need for imported fuel to compensate for that loss is likely to create new risks for stable fuel prices and supply.(5)(e) Sudden and unmanaged exits of critical legacy energy infrastructure can have significant negative impacts on energy security, local governments, worker safety, consumer prices, public health, environmental protection, and the communities that depend on jobs and revenue from those industries.(6)Market adjustments must also align with California’s trailblazing climate policies.(7)Industry participants have identified several intersecting regulatory and administrative issues in maintaining systemwide stability, including crude oil extraction and delivery, the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission’s regulatory tools, the 2020 At Berth Regulation, the California Cap-and-Invest Program, and other issues related to local, regional, and state authorities.(8)(f) The State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission continues to engage with a wide range of impacted stakeholders and communities to discuss these above-described issues and possible solutions to those issues. develop a holistic view of the petroleum value chain and to establish solutions that best protect consumers.(b)It is the intent of the Legislature to develop a holistic view of the petroleum value chain and to establish solutions that best protect consumers.SEC. 2.Section 25372.5 is added to the Public Resources Code, immediately following Section 25372.4, to read:25372.5.(a)The Interagency Working Group on Transportation Fuels Transition Strategy is hereby established, to be led by the commission, and consisting of all of the following:(1)The California Environmental Protection Agency.(2)The Natural Resources Agency.(3)The Transportation Agency.(4)The State Air Resources Board.(5)The State Water Resources Control Board.(6)The Department of Industrial Relations.(7)The State Lands Commission.(8)Relevant air districts.(9)Local governments.(10)Airports.(11)Ports.(b)Local agencies may participate in the Interagency Working Group on Transportation Fuels Transition Strategy.(c)The Interagency Working Group on Transportation Fuels Transition Strategy shall do both of the following:(1)Develop priority policies and programs informed by the Transportation Fuels Transition Plan prepared pursuant to Section 25371.3 and the assessment described in Section 25371.4.(2)Strengthen coordination and communication regarding policies and regulations across state, regional, and local authorities, communities, and stakeholders in order to inform transportation fuels policy development and implementation, including both of the following:(A)Develop recommendations, as needed, for policies and programs that ensure a successfully managed transportation fuels sector that maintains environmental, public health, labor, economic, and consumer protections while state-of-the-art new clean energy systems are developed and implemented to meet California’s demand for transportation fuels and energy.(B)Propose opportunities for partnership between the Governor’s office, state agencies, boards, commissions, offices, the Independent Consumer Fuels Advisory Committee established pursuant to Section 25373, and other entities, as necessary, and the Legislature in order to advance solutions to strategically align regulations and permitting processes across all levels of government that could best support achievement of state policy goals.(d)(1)The commission shall annually convene at least one public meeting of the Interagency Working Group on Transportation Fuels Transition Strategy to provide members of the public with information and to receive information and comments from the public.(2)The commission shall request representatives from the entities listed in subdivision (a) to attend the public meeting.(3)The public meeting may be combined with a meeting of the Independent Consumer Fuels Advisory Committee.SEC. 2. Section 25370.5 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:25370.5. On or before January 31, 2029, the commission shall enter into memoranda of understanding with relevant air districts and local governments with transportation fuels refining facilities within their jurisdictions to enable the coordination that is needed to ensure the transportation fuels sector is successfully managed and maintains environmental, public health, labor, economic, and consumer protections.